California statutes. Insurance Code
 drugs administered or provided under a health insurer’s medical benefit and drugs prescribed under a health insurer’s prescription drug benefit and about how to obtain coverage information about drugs that are not covered under the health insurer’s prescription drug benefit.

(D) Include information to educate insureds that health insurers that provide prescription drug benefits are required to have a method for insureds to obtain prescription drugs not listed in the health insurer’s drug formulary if the drugs are deemed to be medically necessary by a clinician pursuant to Section 1367.24 of the Health and Safety Code, as required by clause (iv) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10112.27.

(E) Include information on which medications are covered, including both generic and brand name.

(F) Include information on what tier of the health insurer’s drug formulary each medication is in.

(c) The commissioner may adopt regulations as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. In adopting regulations, the commissioner shall comply with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) For purposes of this section, “formulary” means the complete list of drugs preferred for use and eligible for coverage under a health insurance product and includes the drugs covered under the pharmacy benefit of the product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 619, Sec. 6.   (AB 339)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.193.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, its implementing regulations and guidance, and related state law prohibit discrimination based on a person’s expected length of life, present or predicted disability, degree of medical dependency, quality of life, or other health conditions, including benefit designs that have the effect of discouraging the enrollment of individuals with significant health needs.

(2) The Legislature intends to build on the
 existing state and federal law to ensure that health coverage benefit designs do not have an unreasonable discriminatory impact on chronically ill individuals, and to ensure affordability of outpatient prescription drugs.

(3) Assignment of all or most prescription medications that treat a specific medical condition to the highest cost tiers of a formulary may effectively discourage enrollment by chronically ill individuals, and may result in lower adherence to a prescription drug treatment regimen.

(b) A nongrandfathered policy of health insurance that is offered, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2017, shall comply with this section. The cost-sharing limits established by this section apply only to outpatient prescription drugs covered by the policy that
 constitute essential health benefits, as defined by Section 10112.27.

(c) A policy of health insurance that provides coverage for outpatient prescription drugs shall cover medically necessary prescription drugs, including nonformulary drugs determined to be medically necessary consistent with this part.

(d) Copayments, coinsurance, and other cost sharing for outpatient prescription drugs shall be reasonable so as to allow access to medically necessary outpatient prescription drugs.

(e) (1) Consistent with federal law and guidance, the formulary or formularies for outpatient prescription drugs maintained by the health insurer shall not discourage the enrollment of individuals with health conditions and
 shall not reduce the generosity of the benefit for insureds with a particular condition in a manner that is not based on a clinical indication or reasonable medical management practices. Section 1342.7 of the Health and Safety Code and any regulations adopted pursuant to that section shall be interpreted in a manner that is consistent with this section.

(2) For combination antiretroviral drug treatments that are medically necessary for the treatment of AIDS/HIV, a policy of health insurance shall cover a single-tablet drug regimen that is as effective as a multitablet regimen unless, consistent with clinical guidelines and peer-reviewed scientific and medical literature, the multitablet regimen is clinically equally or more effective and more likely to result in adherence to a drug regimen.

(3) Any limitation or utilization management shall be consistent with and based on clinical guidelines and peer-reviewed scientific and medical literature. 

(f) (1) This section shall not be construed to require a health insurer to impose cost sharing.

(2) This section shall not be construed to require cost sharing for prescription drugs that state or federal law otherwise requires to be provided without cost sharing.

(3) A prescription drug benefit shall provide that if the pharmacy’s retail price for a prescription drug is less than the applicable copayment or coinsurance amount, the insured shall not be required to pay more than the retail price. The payment rendered shall constitute the
 applicable cost sharing and shall apply to the deductible, if any, and also to the maximum out-of-pocket limit in the same manner as if the enrollee had purchased the prescription medication by paying the cost-sharing amount.

(g) A policy of health insurance shall ensure that the placement of prescription drugs on formulary tiers is based on clinically indicated, reasonable medical management practices.

(h) In the provision of outpatient prescription drug coverage, a health insurer may utilize formulary, prior authorization, step therapy, or other reasonable medical management practices consistent with this part.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 204) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 787, Sec. 5.   (SB 1021)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.1932.

(a) (1) With respect to an individual or group policy of health insurance subject to Section 10112.28, the copayment, coinsurance, or any other form of cost sharing for a covered outpatient prescription drug for an individual prescription for a supply of up to 30 days shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250), except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3).

(2) With respect to products with actuarial value at or equivalent to the bronze level, cost sharing for a covered outpatient prescription drug for an individual prescription for a supply of up to 30 days shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500), except as provided in paragraph (3).

(3) For a policy of health insurance that is a “high deductible health plan” under the definition set forth in Section 223(c)(2) of Title 26 of the United States Code, paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subdivision shall apply only once an insured’s deductible has been satisfied for the year.

(4) For a nongrandfathered individual or small group policy of health insurance, the annual deductible for outpatient drugs, if any, shall not exceed twice the amount specified in paragraph (1) or (2), respectively.

(5) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (2), “any other form of cost sharing” shall not include a deductible.

(6) A copayment or percentage coinsurance shall not
 exceed 50 percent of the cost to the insurer, as described in Section 1300.67.24 of Title 28 of the California Code of Regulations.

(7) If there is a generic equivalent to a brand name drug, an insurer shall ensure that the insured is subject to the lowest cost sharing that would be applied, whether or not both the generic equivalent and the brand name drug are on the formulary. This paragraph shall not be construed to require both the generic equivalent and the brand name drug to be on the formulary.

(b) (1) If a policy of health insurance offered, sold, or renewed in the nongrandfathered individual or small group market maintains a drug formulary grouped into tiers that includes a fourth tier, a policy of health insurance shall use the following definitions for each
 tier of the drug formulary:

(A) Tier one shall consist of most generic drugs and low-cost preferred brand name drugs.

(B) Tier two shall consist of nonpreferred generic drugs, preferred brand name drugs, and any other drugs recommended by the health insurer’s pharmacy and therapeutics committee based on safety, efficacy, and cost.

(C) Tier three shall consist of nonpreferred brand name drugs or drugs that are recommended by the health insurer’s pharmacy and therapeutics committee based on safety, efficacy, and cost, or that generally have a preferred and often less costly therapeutic alternative at a lower tier.

(D) Tier four shall consist of drugs that the
 Food and Drug Administration of the United States Department of Health and Human Services or the manufacturer requires to be distributed through a specialty pharmacy, drugs that require the insured to have special training or clinical monitoring for self-administration, or drugs that cost the health insurer more than six hundred dollars ($600) net of rebates for a one-month supply.

(2) In placing specific drugs on specific tiers, or choosing to place a drug on the formulary, the insurer shall comply with the other provisions of this section and this part.

(3) A policy of health insurance may maintain a
 drug formulary with fewer than four tiers. A policy of health insurance shall not maintain a drug formulary with more than four tiers.

(4) This section shall not be construed to limit a health insurer from placing any drug in a lower tier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 820, Sec. 2.   (AB 948)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.1933.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10123.201, a health insurer shall not subject antiretroviral drugs that are medically necessary for the prevention of AIDS/HIV, including preexposure prophylaxis or postexposure prophylaxis, to prior authorization or step therapy, except as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) If the United States Food and Drug Administration has approved one or more therapeutic equivalents of a drug, device, or product for the prevention of AIDS/HIV, this section does not require a health insurer to cover all of the therapeutically equivalent versions without prior authorization or step therapy, if at least one therapeutically equivalent version is covered without prior authorization or step therapy.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a health insurer shall not prohibit, or permit a contracted pharmacy benefit manager to prohibit, a pharmacist from dispensing preexposure prophylaxis or postexposure prophylaxis.

(c) A health insurer shall cover preexposure prophylaxis and postexposure prophylaxis that has been furnished by a pharmacist, as authorized in Sections 4052.02 and 4052.03 of the Business and Professions Code, including the pharmacist’s services and related testing ordered by the pharmacist. A health insurer shall pay or reimburse, consistent with the requirements of this chapter, for the service performed by a pharmacist at an in-network pharmacy or a pharmacist at an out-of-network pharmacy if the health insurer has an out-of-network pharmacy benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1, Sec. 3.   (SB 339)   Effective February 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.1935.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a group or individual health insurer offering an outpatient prescription drug benefit shall provide coverage for at least one medication approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration in each of the following categories without prior authorization, step therapy, or utilization review:

(1) Medication for the reversal of opioid overdose, including a naloxone product or another opioid antagonist.

(2) Medication for the detoxification or maintenance treatment of a substance use disorder, including a daily oral buprenorphine product.

(3) A long-acting buprenorphine
 product.

(4) A long-acting injectable naltrexone product.

(b) This section does not prohibit a health insurer from selecting an AB-rated generic equivalent, biosimilar, as defined in Section 262(i)(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code, or interchangeable biological product, as defined in Section 262(i)(3) of Title 42 of the United States Code, to meet the requirements of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 633, Sec. 2.   (AB 1842)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.194.

(a) Every disability insurer that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses, and, as part of that coverage, also covers prescription drug benefits, and that issues a card to insureds for claims processing purposes, shall issue to each of its insureds a uniform card containing uniform prescription drug information. The uniform prescription drug information card shall, at a minimum, include the following information:

(1) The name or logo of the benefit administrator or disability insurer issuing the card, which shall be displayed on the front side of the card.

(2) The insured’s identification number, or the policyholder’s identification number when the insured is a dependent who accesses services using the policy holder’s identification number, which shall be displayed on the front side of the card.

(3) A telephone number that pharmacy providers may call for assistance.

(4) Information required by the benefit administrator or disability insurer that is necessary to commence processing the pharmacy claim, except as provided for in paragraph (5).

(5) A disability insurer shall not be required to print any of the following information on an insured’s card:

(A) Any number that is the same for all of its insured, provided that the disability insurer provides this number to the pharmacy on an annual basis.

(B) Any information that may result in fraudulent use of the card.

(C) Any information that is otherwise prohibited from being included on the card.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2002, the new uniform prescription drug information card required by subdivision (a) shall be issued by an insurer to an insured upon enrollment or upon any change in the insured’s coverage that impacts the data content or format of the card.

(c) Nothing in this section requires an insurer to issue a separate card for prescription drug coverage if the insurer issues a card for health care coverage in general and the card is able to accommodate the information required by subdivision (a).

(d) “Card” as used in this section includes other technology that performs substantially the same function as a card.

(e) For purposes of this section, if a disability insurer delegates responsibility for issuing the uniform prescription drug information card to a contractor or agent, then the contract between the disability insurer and its contractor or agent shall require compliance with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 622, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.1945.

(a) (1) A disability insurance policy issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after January 1, 2024, except for a grandfathered health plan or a qualifying health plan for a health savings account, shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or any other cost-sharing requirement on vasectomy services or procedures. For a qualifying health plan for a health savings account, an insurer shall establish the plan’s cost sharing for vasectomy services and procedures at the minimum level necessary to preserve the insured’s ability to claim tax-exempt contributions and withdrawals from the insured’s health savings account under Internal Revenue Service laws, regulations, and guidance.

(2) An insurer shall not impose any restrictions or delays, including, but not limited to, prior authorization, on vasectomy services and procedures.

(3) Coverage with respect to an insured under this section shall be identical for an insured’s covered spouse and covered nonspouse dependents.

(b) This section shall not be construed to deny or restrict in any way an existing right or benefit provided under law or by contract.

(c) This section shall not be construed to require an individual or group disability insurance policy to cover experimental or investigational treatments.

(d) Notwithstanding
 any other provision of this section, a religious employer may request a disability insurance policy without coverage for contraceptive methods that are contrary to the religious employer’s religious tenets. If so requested, a disability insurance policy shall be provided without coverage for vasectomy services and procedures. The exclusion from coverage under this provision shall not apply to vasectomy services or procedures for purposes other than contraception.

(1) An insurer that contracts with a religious employer to provide a disability insurance policy that does not include coverage and benefits for vasectomy services and procedures shall notify, in writing, upon initial enrollment and annually thereafter upon renewal, each enrollee that vasectomy services and procedures are not included in the insured’s disability
 insurance policy.

(2) For purposes of this section, a “religious employer” is an entity for which each of the following is true:

(A) The inculcation of religious values is the purpose of the entity.

(B) The entity primarily employs persons who share the religious tenets of the entity.

(C) The entity serves primarily persons who share the religious tenets of the entity.

(D) The entity is a nonprofit organization pursuant to Section 6033(a)(3)(A)(i) or (iii) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

(e) This section only applies to
 disability insurance policies or contracts that are defined as health benefit plans pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10198.6, except that for accident only, specified disease, or hospital indemnity coverage, coverage for benefits under this section applies to the extent that the benefits are covered under the general terms and conditions that apply to all other benefits under the policy or contract. This section shall not be construed as imposing a new benefit mandate on accident only, specified disease, or hospital indemnity insurance.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Grandfathered health plan” has the meaning set forth in Section 1251 of PPACA.

(2) “PPACA” means the federal
 Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 630, Sec. 16.   (SB 523)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.195.

(a) A group or individual disability insurance policy issued, delivered, or renewed in this state or certificate of group disability insurance issued, delivered, or renewed in this state pursuant to a master group policy issued, delivered, or renewed in another state that, as a provision of hospital, medical, or surgical services, directly or indirectly covers prescription drugs shall not limit or exclude coverage for a drug on the basis that the drug is prescribed for a use that is different from the use for which that drug has been approved for marketing by the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA), provided that all of the following conditions have been met:

(1) The drug is approved by the FDA.

(2) (A) The drug is prescribed by a contracting licensed health care professional for the treatment of a life-threatening condition; or

(B) The drug is prescribed by a contracting licensed health care professional for the treatment of a chronic and seriously debilitating condition, the drug is medically necessary to treat that condition, and the drug is on the insurer’s formulary, if any.

(3) The drug has been recognized for treatment of that condition by any of the following:

(A) The American Hospital Formulary Service’s Drug Information.

(B) One of the following compendia, if recognized by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as part of an anticancer chemotherapeutic regimen:

(i) The Elsevier Gold Standard’s Clinical Pharmacology.

(ii) The National Comprehensive Cancer Network Drug and Biologics Compendium.

(iii) The Thomson Micromedex DrugDex.

(C) Two articles from major peer reviewed medical journals that present data supporting the proposed off-label use or uses as generally safe and effective unless there is clear and convincing contradictory evidence presented in a major peer reviewed medical journal.

(b) (1) A group or individual health insurance policy issued, delivered, or renewed in this state or certificate of group health insurance issued, delivered, or renewed in this state pursuant to a master group policy issued, delivered, or renewed in another state that, as a provision of hospital, medical, or surgical services, directly or indirectly covers prescription drugs shall not limit or exclude coverage for brand name or generic mifepristone solely on the basis that the drug is prescribed for a use that is different from the use for which that drug has been approved for marketing by the FDA or that varies from an approved risk evaluation and mitigation strategy pursuant to Section 355-1 of Title 21 of the United States Code, except if the state deems it necessary to address an imminent health or safety concern regarding brand name or generic mifepristone.

(2) A group or individual health insurance policy issued, delivered, or renewed in this state or certificate of group health insurance issued, delivered, or renewed in this state pursuant to a master group policy issued, delivered, or renewed in another state that, as a provision of hospital, medical, or surgical services, directly or indirectly covers prescription drugs shall include coverage for brand name or generic mifepristone, even if the drug has not been approved by the FDA for abortion if the requirements of paragraph (3) have been met, except if the state deems it necessary to address an imminent health or safety concern regarding brand name or generic mifepristone.

(3) If name brand or generic mifepristone has not been approved by the FDA for abortion, coverage is
 required pursuant to paragraph (2) if the drug is a recognized medication for abortion by the World Health Organization (WHO) Model List of Essential Medicines, the WHO abortion care guideline, or the National Academies of Science, Engineering, and Medicine Consensus Study Report, or if the state approves its use based on peer-reviewed studies and prior approval of the drug that is no longer in effect.

(c) It shall be the responsibility of the contracting prescriber to submit to the insurer documentation supporting compliance with the requirements of subdivision (a), if requested by the insurer.

(d) Any coverage required by this section shall also include medically necessary services associated with the administration of a drug subject to the conditions of the policy.

(e) For purposes of this section, “life-threatening” means either or both of the following:

(1) Diseases or conditions where the likelihood of death is high unless the course of the disease is interrupted.

(2) Diseases or conditions with potentially fatal outcomes, where the end point of clinical intervention is survival.

(f) For purposes of this section, “chronic and seriously debilitating” means diseases or conditions that require ongoing treatment to maintain remission or prevent deterioration and cause significant long-term morbidity.

(g) The provision of drugs and services when required by this section
 shall not, in itself, give rise to liability on the part of the insurer.

(h) This section shall not apply to a policy of disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses that is issued outside of California to an employer whose principal place of business is located outside of California.

(i) This section does not prohibit the use of a formulary, copayment, technology assessment panel, or similar mechanism as a means for appropriately controlling the utilization of a drug that is prescribed for a use that is different from the use for which that drug has been approved for marketing by the FDA.

(j) If an insurer denies coverage pursuant to this section on the basis that its use is experimental or
 investigational, that decision is subject to review under the Independent Medical Review System of Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 10169).

(k) This section is not applicable to vision-only, dental-only, Medicare or Champus supplement, disability income, long-term care, accident-only, specified disease or hospital confinement indemnity insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 136, Sec. 19.   (AB 260)   Effective September 26, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.196.

(a) An individual or group policy of disability insurance issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after January 1, 2000, through December 31, 2015, inclusive, that provides coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical expenses, shall provide coverage for the following, under the same terms and conditions as applicable to all benefits:

(1) A disability insurance policy that provides coverage for outpatient prescription drug benefits shall include coverage for a variety of federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA)-approved prescription contraceptive methods, as designated by the insurer. If an insured’s health care provider determines that none of the methods designated by
 the disability insurer is medically appropriate for the insured’s medical or personal history, the insurer shall, in the alternative, provide coverage for some other FDA-approved prescription contraceptive method prescribed by the patient’s health care provider.

(2) Coverage with respect to an insured under this subdivision shall be identical for an insured’s covered spouse and covered nonspouse dependents.

(b) (1) A group or individual policy of disability insurance, except for a specialized health insurance policy, that is issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after January 1, 2016, shall provide coverage for all of the following services and contraceptive methods for all policyholders and insureds:

(A) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii) and in subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (2), all FDA-approved, contraceptive drugs, devices, and other products, including all FDA-approved, contraceptive drugs, devices, and products available over the counter, as prescribed by the insured’s provider.

(ii) For any policy described in paragraph (1) that is issued,
 amended, renewed, or delivered on or after January 1, 2024, both of the following conditions shall apply:

(I) A prescription shall not be required to trigger coverage of over-the-counter FDA-approved contraceptive drugs, devices, and products.

(II) Point-of-sale coverage for over-the-counter FDA-approved contraceptive drugs, devices, and products shall be provided at in-network pharmacies without cost sharing or medical management restrictions.

(B) Voluntary tubal ligation and other similar sterilization procedures.

(C) Clinical services related to the provision or use of contraception, including consultations, examinations, procedures, device
 insertion, ultrasound, anesthesia, patient education, referrals, and counseling.

(D) Followup services related to the drugs, devices, products, and procedures covered under this subdivision, including, but not limited to, management of side effects, counseling for continued adherence, and device removal.

(2) (A) Except for a grandfathered health plan, a disability insurer subject to this subdivision shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or any other cost-sharing requirement on the coverage provided pursuant to this subdivision.

(B) If the FDA has approved one or more therapeutic
 equivalents, as that term is defined by the FDA, of a contraceptive drug, device, or product, a disability insurer is not required to cover all of those therapeutically equivalent versions in accordance with this subdivision, as long as at least one is covered without cost sharing in accordance with this subdivision. If there is no therapeutically equivalent generic substitute available in the market, an insurer shall provide coverage without cost sharing for the original, brand name contraceptive.

(C) If a covered therapeutic equivalent of a drug, device, or product is deemed medically inadvisable by the insured’s provider, a disability insurer shall
 defer to the determination and judgment of the provider and provide coverage for the alternative prescribed contraceptive drug, device, product, or service without imposing any cost-sharing requirements. Medical inadvisability may include considerations such as severity of side effects, differences in permanence or reversibility of contraceptives, and ability to adhere to the appropriate use of the drug or item, as determined by the provider. The department may promulgate regulations establishing an easily accessible, transparent, and sufficiently expedient process that is not unduly burdensome, including timeframes, for an insured, an insured’s designee, or an insured’s provider to request coverage of an alternative prescribed contraceptive. A request for coverage under this subparagraph that is submitted by an insured, an insured’s designee, or a provider shall be approved by
 the disability insurer in compliance with the time limits in Section 10123.191.

(3) Except as otherwise authorized under this section, an insurer shall not infringe upon an insured’s choice of contraceptive drug, device, or product and shall not impose any restrictions or delays on the coverage required under this subdivision, including prior authorization, step therapy, or other utilization control techniques.

(4) Coverage with respect to an insured under this subdivision shall be identical for an insured’s covered spouse and covered nonspouse dependents.

(c) This section shall not be construed to deny or restrict in any way any existing right or benefit provided under law or by contract.

(d) This section shall not be construed to require an individual or group disability insurance policy to cover experimental or investigational treatments.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a religious employer may request a disability insurance policy without coverage for contraceptive methods that are contrary to the religious employer’s religious tenets. If so requested, a disability insurance policy shall be provided without coverage for contraceptive methods. The exclusion from coverage under this provision shall not apply to a contraceptive drug, device, procedure, or other product that is used for purposes other than contraception.

(2) For purposes of this
 section, a “religious employer” is an entity for which each of the following is true:

(A) The inculcation of religious values is the purpose of the entity.

(B) The entity primarily employs persons who share the religious tenets of the entity.

(C) The entity serves primarily persons who share the religious tenets of the entity.

(D) The entity is a nonprofit organization pursuant to Section 6033(a)(3)(A)(i) or (iii) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

(f) (1) A group or individual policy of disability insurance, except for a specialized health insurance policy,
 that is issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after January 1, 2017, shall cover up to a 12-month supply of FDA-approved, self-administered hormonal contraceptives when dispensed or furnished at one time for an insured by a provider, pharmacist, or at a location licensed or otherwise authorized to dispense drugs or supplies.

(2) This subdivision shall not be construed to require a policy to cover contraceptives provided by an
 out-of-network provider, pharmacy, or location licensed or otherwise authorized to dispense drugs or supplies, except as may be otherwise authorized by state or federal law or by the insurer’s policies governing out-of-network coverage.

(3) This subdivision shall not be construed to require a provider to prescribe, furnish, or dispense 12 months of self-administered hormonal contraceptives at one time.

(4) An insurer subject to this subdivision shall not impose utilization controls or other forms of medical management limiting the supply of FDA-approved, self-administered hormonal contraceptives that may be dispensed or furnished by a provider or pharmacist, or at a location licensed or otherwise authorized to dispense drugs or supplies to an amount that is less
 than a 12-month supply, and shall not require an insured to make any formal request for such coverage other than a pharmacy claim.

(g) This section shall not be construed to exclude coverage for contraceptive supplies as prescribed by a provider, acting within the provider’s scope of practice, for reasons other than contraceptive purposes, such as decreasing the risk of ovarian cancer or eliminating symptoms of menopause, or for contraception that is necessary to preserve the life or health of an insured.

(h) This section only applies to disability insurance policies or contracts that are defined as health benefit plans pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10198.6, except that for accident only, specified disease, or hospital indemnity coverage, coverage for benefits under
 this section applies to the extent that the benefits are covered under the general terms and conditions that apply to all other benefits under the policy or contract. This section shall not be construed as imposing a new benefit mandate on accident only, specified disease, or hospital indemnity insurance.

(i) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Grandfathered health plan” has the meaning set forth in Section 1251 of PPACA.

(2) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued thereunder.

(3) With respect to policies of disability insurance issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2016, “health care provider” means an individual who is certified or licensed to furnish family planning services within their scope of practice pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, including a pharmacist authorized pursuant to Section 4052 or 4052.3 of the Business and Professions Code, or an initiative act referred to in that division, or Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797) of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) For purposes of this section, “over-the-counter FDA-approved contraceptive drugs, devices, and products” and “over-the-counter birth control methods” are limited to those included as essential health
 benefits pursuant to Section 10112.27.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 630, Sec. 17.   (SB 523)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.1961.

(a) (1) The requirements of this section shall apply to a group or individual policy or certificate of health insurance or student blanket disability insurance that provides coverage for hospital, medical, or surgical expenses that is issued, amended, renewed, or delivered on or after January 1, 2023. This section does not apply to a specialized health insurance policy. A policy or certificate subject to the requirements of this section shall not impose a deductible, coinsurance, copayment, or other cost-sharing requirement on coverage for all abortion and abortion-related services,
 including preabortion and followup services.

(2) Except as otherwise authorized by this section, an insurer shall not impose any utilization management or utilization review, including prior authorization and annual or lifetime limits consistent with Sections 10112.1 and 10112.27, on the coverage for outpatient abortion services.

(b) This section does not deny or restrict in any way the department's authority to ensure an insurer’s compliance with this chapter when the insurer provides coverage for
 abortion services.

(c) This section does not require an individual or group disability insurance policy to cover an experimental or investigational treatment.

(d) For purposes of this section, “abortion” means any medical treatment intended to induce the termination of a pregnancy except for the purpose of producing a live birth.

(e) For a group or individual policy or certificate of health insurance or student blanket disability insurance that is a high deductible health plan, as defined in Section 223(c)(2) of Title 26 of the United States Code, the cost-sharing limits in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall apply once an insured’s deductible has been satisfied for the benefit year.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the commissioner may interpret and implement this section by issuing guidance without taking any further regulatory action. The commissioner shall consult with the Department of Managed Health Care in issuing guidance under this section. The department shall adopt regulations on or before January 1, 2026, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 11, Sec. 2.   (SB 245)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.197.

(a) A request for an exception to a health insurer’s step therapy process for prescription drugs may be submitted in the same manner as a request for prior authorization for prescription drugs pursuant to Section 10123.191, and shall be treated in the same manner, and shall be responded to by the health insurer in the same manner, as a request for prior authorization for prescription drugs.

(b) The department and the Department of Managed Health Care shall include a provision for step therapy exception requests in the uniform prior authorization form developed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 10123.191.

(c) “Step therapy exception” means a decision to override a generally applicable step
 therapy protocol in favor of coverage of the prescription drug prescribed by a health care provider for an individual insured.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 742, Sec. 5.   (AB 347)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

10123.198.

(a) On and after July 1, 2011, in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (b), a health insurer that provides coverage for professional mental health services shall issue an identification card to an insured in order to assist the insured with accessing health benefits coverage information, including, but not limited to, in-network provider access information, and claims processing purposes. The identification card, at a minimum, shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the health insurer issuing the identification card.

(2) The insured’s identification number.

(3) A telephone number that insureds or providers may call for assistance with health benefits coverage information, in-network provider access information, and claims processing information, and if assessment services are provided by the health insurer, access to assessment services for the purpose of referral to an appropriate level of care or an appropriate health care provider.

(4) The health insurer’s Internet Web site address.
